hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX W9 йыны янторъясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янторъясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янторъясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясанӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснад/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснам/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснас/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснысӧ/G2 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяснытӧ/G2 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясся/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъяссяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясті/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъястӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясын/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янъясысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янын/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны янысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны яс/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны ясны/G1G2G3 .
SFX W9 йыны ясныс/G1G2G3 .

SFX Y0 Y 10 # отрицатель
SFX Y0 0 ӧ .
SFX Y0 0 ӧй .
SFX Y0 0 0/G1 .
SFX Y0 0 ӧ/G1 .
SFX Y0 0 0/G2 .
SFX Y0 0 ӧ/G2 .
SFX Y0 0 0/G3 .
SFX Y0 0 ӧ/G3 .
SFX Y0 0 0/G4 .
SFX Y0 0 ӧ/G4 .

SFX Y1 Y 3 # экзистенциал
SFX Y1 0 0/O1O2 .
SFX Y1 0 0/G1G2G3G4 .
SFX Y1 0 ӧсь .

SFX Y2 Y 1 # экзистенциал неизмен
SFX Y2 0 0 .

PFX Y3 Y 1 # отрицатель
PFX Y3 0 мʼ .

SFX Z0 Y 1 # свалка
SFX Z0 0 0 .

SFX Z1 Y 1 # звукоподр.
SFX Z1 0 0/G3 .

SFX Z2 Y 2 # парные
SFX Z2 0 0/G3G4 .
SFX Z2 0 ӧн .

SFX Z3 Y 1 # звукоподр. животн.
SFX Z3 0 0 .
