hunspell/kpv/komi.dic
ассигнуйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
поддерживайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гӧльмӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
одурманивайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лэптыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
путкыльтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лимзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мазьӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
репрессируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
охватывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧтувтчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
размывайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
квалифицируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
эксплуатируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кеняссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чужйыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нуӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
обобщайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
опыляйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пропагандируйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лювзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вензьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧрзьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шузьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
жулльыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дубъяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выдвигайтчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тшӧктывсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чатӧртчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тасмаавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
веськыдавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ударникавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тойлавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
инмавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мӧвпавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
котравсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лётавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пасьтавсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чӧвсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
палявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
жуявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
оръявсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нӧбӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гажӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ӧшйӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
выльмӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мыччӧдсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йиджсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
резсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ёвксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зырксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
дӧмсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гӧгӧрвосьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пурсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
йӧгассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зарниассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мусукассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
вӧлассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кӧмассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чапассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
петшӧрассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кӧтассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
майшассьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
неджӧгӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
тшакӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ёгтурунӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
чутӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
пиньӧссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кывзыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
росйыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
эскыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
видзӧдлыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кынмыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
суктыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бергӧдчыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
лыддьыссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
розяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
гыдъяссьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
кытшовтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
заводитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
белитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
шпионитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
прӧверитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
бурлачитсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
подтверждайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
мечтайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
изготовляйтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
нетшыштсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
певксьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
намечайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
карайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
зульсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
усваивайтсьыны/W3W9V0V5V7
ог/Y0Y3
од/Y0Y3
оз/Y0Y3
он/Y0Y3
эг/Y0Y3
эд/Y0Y3
эз/Y0Y3
эн/Y0Y3
абу/Y1
выйим/Y1
эм/Y1
трооннь/Z1
кыйк/Z1
тью-уу/Z1
вальк/Z1
а-о-уу/Z1
бам/Z1
бе-бе/Z1
бо-бо-бо/Z1
б-о-о-о-о-м-м/Z1
брынс/Z1
бульк/Z1
бу-х-х/Z1
бытш/Z1
вач/Z1
виш/Z1
гав/Z1
гизь/Z1
гольс/Z1
гуйю/Z1
г-у-у-уррр/Z1
джӧм/Z1
дзин-дзин-дзин/Z1
дзужж/Z1
дізь/Z1
бр-у-у-у-ль/Z1
ггууррр/Z1
дзувк/Z1# синводзса енэжтасыс, содтӧд, югзис дзувк биӧн
зи-илль/Z1
пусь/Z1
тірс/Z1
туруру/Z1
шварк/Z1
ш-швач/Z1
дув/Z1
жбун/Z1
жвинь/Z1
жжыть/Z1
жуль/Z1
звирк/Z1
зітш/Z1
зырк/Z1
каж/Z1
квот-квот/Z1
клес/Z1
клюв/Z1
кре/Z1
кукку/Z1
кырр/Z1
люс/Z1
ням/Z1
пиф/Z1
пф/Z1
ратш/Z1
рррас/Z1
склян/Z1
ссс-ссс/Z1
тальс/Z1
татш/Z1
ти-инь-нь/Z1
тінь/Z1
торк/Z1
тпу-тпу-тпу/Z1
тра-та-та-та/Z1
тринь/Z1
тр-р-р-р/Z1
тси-р-р/Z1
ту-у-ту-ту/Z1
тшӧкӧб/Z1
тюрлик/Z1
у/Z1
у-у-у/Z1
у-у-у-ы-ы-ы/Z1
хик/Z1
ци-ци-ци/Z1
чав/Z1
чик/Z1
чок-чок/Z1
чу/Z1
шарк/Z1
швы-ырк/Z1
шку-ув/Z1
шлоп/Z1
шляч/Z1
шпр/Z1
шш/Z1
шыльк/Z1
ыз-з-з/Z1
ы-ы-ы/Z1
чж-ж/Z1
станк/Z1
чики-кок/Z1
цик/Z1
шорс/Z1# шурс да ~
ы-ый/Z1
бу-умм/Z1
урки-варки/Z2
тіньнь-тонь-нь-нь/Z2
діньнь-доньнь/Z2
тив-тав/Z2
клуна-клёна/Z2
гильс-гольс/Z2
тілки-толки/Z2
сурым-сарым/Z2
пусов-песов/Z2
тресь-трась/Z2
тили-бом/Z2
туки-тук/Z2
крум-крум/Z2
вунь-вень/Z2
сыри-лепетки/Z2
тіри-бари/Z2
гира-гура/Z2
тіп-тап/Z2
зиля-зяля/Z2
гурр-гурр/Z2
биз-буз/Z2
брун-брон/Z2
був-бов/Z2
булс-болс/Z2
буля-боля/Z2
быз-баз/Z2
вач-вач/Z2
вича-вача/Z2
вур-вар/Z2
гальс-гальс/Z2
гизь-базь/Z2
гили-голь/Z2
гира-гара/Z2
гирс-горс/Z2
гӧт-гӧт/Z2
гру-гру/Z2
грыми-йирки/Z2
гуль-голь/Z2
гульс-гольс/Z2
гунь-гонь/Z2
гури-гари/Z2
дзижки-пражки/Z2
дзиринь-дзеринь/Z2
дзужа-дзажа/Z2
дзурки-дзурк/Z2
дов-дов/Z2
дув-дов/Z2
жбольк-жбольк/Z2
зиля-зёля/Z2
зыми-йирки/Z2
кань-кань/Z2
кирна-рина/Z2
клуп-клоп/Z2
крив-крив/Z2
кува-кова/Z2
куньки-каньки/Z2
кушичи-кашичи/Z2
кышым-кашым/Z2
луп-лап/Z2
люзги-лязги/Z2
мув-мав/Z2
нюза-няза/Z2
пуз-паз/Z2
пырк-пырк/Z2# вӧчны
резь-резь/Z2
рук-рук/Z2
сива-сюва/Z2
суп-сап/Z2
сярк-сярк/Z2
тіг-тіг/Z2
тір-тір/Z2
трам-тарарам/Z2
тритшка-тратшка/Z2
тувк-тувк/Z2
тунки-тонки/Z2
тури-леткиӧн/Z2
тутш-тотш/Z2
тюп-тяп/Z2
увг-увг/Z2
чикиль-микиль/Z2
чук-чуки/Z2
чумбыль-чамбыль/Z2
чурс-чурс/Z2
шкув-шков/Z2
шпач-шпач/Z2
шувк-шавк/Z2
шурк-шарк/Z2
ызы-базы/Z2
эр-вар/Z2
вуши-ваши/Z2
зурк-зэрк/Z2
тӧсь-тӧсь/Z2
клынь-клынь/Z2
кышим-кашим/Z2
тюп-тюруп/Z3
мур-мур-муррр/Z3
ы-ы-з/Z3
ав-в/Z3
ф-ють/Z3
гули-гули/Z3
ра-ра-ра/Z3
кувар/Z3
свир-свир/Z3
ты-ыль-ль/Z3
ты-ы-ль-ль/Z3
вув-вув-вув/Z3
курли-курли-курли-ку-у-урр/Z3
чиви-чиви/Z3
мму/Z3
мяяяу/Z3
тирлюли/Z3
корс/Z3# (юсь)
гтш/Z3
гу-гу-гуль-уль/Z3
чирр/Z3
ку-урр/Z3
ко-ко-ко-о/Z3
тюль-тюллю/Z3
гкиак-гкиак/Z3
ала-ла/Z3
вити-вити-вути-вити/Z3
и-и-и-ивв/Z3
испипири-испипири-испипири/Z3
кар-р-р/Z3
кв-и-и-вит/Z3
кви-и-и-вит/Z3
ки-ки-рул-лу/Z3
кикуруллю/Z3
ки-ку-рул-лю-у/Z3
кллу-ук/Z3
клу-кли-кли/Z3
клюк-клюк-клюк/Z3
ко-ко-ко-ко/Z3
кра-а-а-в/Z3
крав-крав/Z3
кря/Z3
кря-кря/Z3
кукарек-ку/Z3
ку-ку-реку/Z3
кур-р-кур/Z3
куррр/Z3
ла-ла-ла/Z3
ме/Z3
ме-е-е/Z3
м-ммы/Z3
ммыа-аа/Z3
мум-му-му/Z3
му-р-р/Z3
му-у/Z3
мя-у/Z3
ня-ав-ав-ав-ву/Z3
ня-ао/Z3
ня-у/Z3
мяу/Z3
пи-пи-пи-у/Z3
пить-пить/Z3
та-ла-ла-ла-ла/Z3
тив-ти-ри-ри-ти-ри-ри-тив/Z3
ти-ти-ти-у-у/Z3
турли/Z3
тюфф-чуф-фышш/Z3
ур-р-р/Z3
фи-и-ить/Z3
фью-ить/Z3
фю-ю-ить/Z3
чив-чив-чив/Z3
чи-ип/Z3
чу-вишш/Z3
чуф-фышш/Z3
мурррр/Z3
мэ-э/Z3
курлы-курлы-ти-ив/Z3
вить-вить-ти-ти-ти-ви-и-ть/Z3
ки-ки-руллю/Z3
буг-гууу/Z3
в-у-у-у/Z3
ис-пипири-испипири/Z3
кабер-кабер/Z3
кар-р-р/Z3
клі-ів-в/Z3
мммяв/Z3
ня-а-а-в/Z3
пить-пить-пирррии/Z3
тив-тирик-тирик/Z3
тю-тю-ля-ля-ля-ди-ди/Z3
фйиуть-фйиуть/Z3
чуви-иш/Z3
эр-р-р/Z3
